Florida, session 2026, SB870.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 11 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 13 (4)âPROTECTION OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE FACILITIES.â 14 (a)âA person may not knowingly or willfully: 15 1.âOperate a drone over a critical infrastructure facility, 16 unless the operation is for a commercial purpose and is 17 authorized by and in compliance with Federal Aviation 18 Administration regulations; 19 2.âAllow a drone to make contact with a critical 20 infrastructure facility, including any person or object on the 21 premises of or within the facility; or 22 3.âAllow a drone to come within a distance of a critical 23 infrastructure facility that is close enough to interfere with 24 the operations of or cause a disturbance to the facility. 25 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.